Utah statutes.
78A-5-103.   District court case management.
(1)  The district court of each district shall develop systems of case
management.
(2)  The case management systems developed by a district court shall:
(a)  ensure judicial accountability for the just and timely disposition of
cases; and
(b)  provide for each judge a full judicial work load that accommodates
differences in the subject matter or complexity of cases assigned to different
judges.
(3)  A district court may establish divisions within the court for the
efficient management of different types of cases.  The existence of divisions
within the court may not:
(a)  affect the jurisdiction of the court nor the validity of court orders; or
(b)  impede public access to the courts.
